Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5682YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2015 Section 1. Section 717B.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. In addition to any other penalty, 3 a person convicted of a violation of subsection 2 shall be 4 ordered by the court to pay restitution to the law enforcement 5 agency for the replacement cost, training, and related expenses 6 incurred for a police service dog that is permanently disabled 7 or killed. 8